Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3730.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.106, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Special requirements. (a) Space for commuter vans. The code must require that any parking ramp or other parking facility constructed in accordance with the code include an appropriate number of spaces suitable for the parking of motor vehicles having a capacity of seven to 16 persons and which are principally used to provide prearranged commuter transportation of employees to or from their place of employment or to or from a transit stop authorized by a local transit authority. (b) Smoke detection devices. The code must require that all dwellings, lodging houses, apartment houses, and hotels as defined in section 299F.362 comply with the provisions of section 299F.362. (c) Doors in nursing homes and hospitals. The State Building Code may not require that each door entering a sleeping or patient's room from a corridor in a nursing home or hospital with an approved complete standard automatic fire extinguishing system be constructed or maintained as self-closing or automatically closing. (d) Child care facilities in churches; ground level exit. A licensed day care center serving fewer than 30 preschool age persons and which is located in a belowground space in a church building is exempt from the State Building Code requirement for a ground level exit when the center has more than two stairways to the ground level and its exit. (e) Family and group family day care. Until the legislature enacts legislation specifying appropriate standards, the definition of dwellings constructed in accordance with the International Residential Code as adopted as part of the State Building Code applies to family and group family day care homes licensed by the Department of Children, Youth, and Families under Minnesota Rules, chapter 9502. (f) Enclosed stairways. No provision of the code or any appendix chapter of the code may require stairways of existing multiple dwelling buildings of two stories or less to be enclosed. (g) Double cylinder dead bolt locks. No provision of the code or appendix chapter of the code may prohibit double cylinder dead bolt locks in existing single-family homes, townhouses, and first floor duplexes used exclusively as a residential dwelling. Any recommendation or promotion of double cylinder dead bolt locks must include a warning about their potential fire danger and procedures to minimize the danger. (h) Relocated residential buildings. A residential building relocated within or into a political subdivision of the state need not comply with the State Energy Code or section 326B.439 provided that, where available, an energy audit is conducted on the relocated building. (i) Automatic garage door opening systems. The code must require all residential buildings as defined in section 325F.82 to comply with the provisions of sections 325F.82 and 325F.83. (j) Exterior wood decks, patios, and balconies. The code must permit the decking surface and upper portions of exterior wood decks, patios, and balconies to be constructed of (1) heartwood from species of wood having natural resistance to decay or termites, including redwood and cedars, (2) grades of lumber which contain sapwood from species of wood having natural resistance to decay or termites, including redwood and cedars, or (3) treated wood. The species and grades of wood products used to construct the decking surface and upper portions of exterior decks, patios, and balconies must be made available to the building official on request before final construction approval. (k) Bioprocess piping and equipment. No permit fee for bioprocess piping may be imposed by municipalities under the State Building Code, except as required under section 326B.92, subdivision 1. Permits for bioprocess piping shall be according to section 326B.92 administered by the Department of Labor and Industry. All data regarding the material production processes, including the bioprocess system's structural design and layout, are nonpublic data as provided by section 13.7911. (l) Use of ungraded lumber. The code must allow the use of ungraded lumber in geographic areas of the state where the code did not generally apply as of April 1, 2008, to the same extent that ungraded lumber could be used in that area before April 1, 2008. (m) Window cleaning safety. The commissioner shall adopt rules, using the expedited rulemaking process in section 14.389, requiring window cleaning safety features that comply with a nationally recognized standard as part of the State Building Code. Window cleaning safety features shall be provided for all windows on: (1) new buildings where determined by the code; and (2) existing buildings undergoing alterations where both of the following conditions are met: (i) the windows do not currently have safe window cleaning features; and (ii) the proposed work area being altered can include provisions for safe window cleaning. (n) Adult-size changing facilities. The commissioner shall adopt rules requiring adult-size changing facilities as part of the State Building Code. new text begin (o) Unvented attic and unvented enclosed rafter assemblies. The commissioner shall adopt rules that deem unvented attic and unvented enclosed rafter assemblies insulated and air sealed with air impermeable insulation with R-30 (maximum U-Factor of 0.038) insulation to meet the requirements of section R402 of the Minnesota Residential Energy Code, provided that the indoor heating, cooling, and ventilation equipment, including ductwork, is inside the unvented attic. new text end